    Edward Yosowitz | Baylor College of Medicine | ZoomInfo.com

Mark R  Yosowitz - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Mark R  Yosowitz
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Mark R  Yosowitz. Find out Mark R  Yosowitz address and contact details. View other people related to Mark R  Yosowitz - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

2000 AVENUE OF THE STARS, 12TH FLOOR LOS ANGELES 90067 CA




Companies related to Mark R  Yosowitz
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001678124CION Ares Diversified Credit Fund3 PARK AVENUE, 36TH FLOOR  NEW YORK 10016




Mark R  Yosowitz on the Web
Persons related to Mark R  Yosowitz - CION Ares Diversified Credit FundNamePositionCityJoshua M  BloomsteinNEW YORKCION Ares Management, LLC10% Owner LOS ANGELESAnthony S  DellLOS ANGELESANTON  FEINGOLDLOS ANGELESMark  GattoNEW YORKMiriam E  GoldsmithARLINGTONMitchell S  GoldsteinNEW YORKDaniel J  HallLOS ANGELESJAMES KELSO  HUNTSTAMFORDKEITH  KOOPERLOS ANGELESScott C  LemLOS ANGELESGregory A  MargoliesNEW YORKPaula B  PretlowLOS ANGELESMichael A  ReisnerNEW YORKPENELOPE F  ROLLWASHINGTONDAVID A  SACHSGregory Michael  SchillNEW YORKJohn Joseph  ShawLOS ANGELESBRUCE H  SPECTORMICHAEL D  WEINERNEW YORKMark R  YosowitzLOS ANGELES
Potentially same personNameCityCountryMark  RColumbusOH












 










Mark R Yosowitz, 49  - New York, NY | MyLife.com™ Background Profile



































Search for your public page


First Name



Last Name



City





Search


*All fields are required
Already a member? Log in


















About & Contact Info






                    Photos && Social Posts






Reviews & Ratings





Court & ArrestRecords





Friends & Family















View Photos



 Edit/Remove

Mark Yosowitz
 New York, NY
 Age: 49 -
								03/27/1968





AKA:
                                                Mark Robert Yosowitz, Mark R Yosowitz













Work Info








                                    Single






Unavailable






 Politics









Education Info





  Edit/Remove My Info

View Full Contact Info
- OR -
View Full Background Details







Reputation Score:
4.00/5




4.00

							        	
													(1 Review)
												






                                        Rate:
                                        
                                            Mark










Improve my Rating
                                                |  
                                                 Ask others to Rate




Ranking: 
Compared to U.S. Population




BAD
POOR
FAIR
GOOD











  Edit/Remove My Info
Contact Info







(212) 260-****









View Email Address, 
                                    
                                         |  Send message











17*** **** Ave


New York, NY 10010







View Full Contact Details
- OR -
View Full Background Details








 + {{bingImagesInit.images.length - 4}} more
 + {{bingImagesInit.images.length - 3}} more



Summary:
                    
Summary:  

currently lives in  



New York
, NY.


            Before that,  lived in
            



New York
, NY.
        















About & Contact Information


Mark's Story




Summary:  

currently lives in  



New York
, NY.


            Before that,  lived in
            



New York
, NY.
        




Contact Information





                            This section includes information on Addresses, Phone Numbers, and Email Addresses
                        




                                                Recent Address
                                            
17*** **** Ave
New York, NY
View Address


Past Address
12*** **** 11d




New York
, NY
View Address


Past Address
11*** **** St




New York
, NY
View Address


Past Address
17*** **** 3




New York
, NY
View Address





                                                     
                                                            Current Phone Number
                                                        
(212) 260-****





    Mark may have hidden Social Profiles & Photos - Check Full Background Report to see Mark's social media activity. This may contain online profiles, dating websites, forgotten social media accounts, and other potentially embarrassing profiles. This may also contain additional contact information, giving you more ways to get in touch.
                




View Full Phone, Email & Address Details





Work History





    Mark may have Work information - Check Full Background Report to see possible job history including what current and previous jobs, companies they may have been employed at, job titles, duration of employment,  and a list of their co-workers.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





School History




    Mark may have Education Information - Check Full Background Report to see possible education history including where and when they attending high school and college, and a complete list of their high school class list.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Properties




    Mark may have Properties - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of known properties. This may contain information such as address, market value, purchase price,  and loan amount.


                View Full Background Details
            





Corporate Affiliations




    Mark may have Corporate Affiliations - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of known corporate affiliations. This may contain information such as company name, job title, address, and time period of service.


                View Full Background Details
            





Licenses and Permits




    Mark may have Licenses & Permits - Check Full Background Report to see weapons permits, Federal Aviation Administration pilot licenses and Drug Enforcement Administration licenses for prescribing controlled pharmaceuticals. If applicable, you will also see Mark's license number and expiration date.
                

                View Full Background Details
            






Photos & Social Posts


Photos









ViewPhotos





    Mark may have Photos - Check Full Background Report to see possible pictures and photo albums found from social and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            







Social Posts





View Social Posts



    We did not find any Social Posts records after searching multiple government records, social and public sources. As part of your premium service, we will continue to search and notify you when we find new information.



    Mark may have hidden Social Profiles & Photos - Check Full Background Report to see Mark's social media activity. This may contain online profiles, dating websites, forgotten social media accounts, and other potentially embarrassing profiles. This may also contain additional contact information, giving you more ways to get in touch.
                





Reviews & Ratings





Mark Yosowitz's Reputation Score:
4.00/5



4.00

						        	
                                            (1 Review)
                                        







                                    Rate:
                                    
                                        Mark










Improve my Rating
                                            |  
                                             Ask others to Rate
                                            |  
                                            Write a Review




Ranking:  Compared to U.S. Population




BAD
POOR
FAIR
GOOD

















Jeffrey Tinsley, CEO & Founder of Mylife.com

Personal Review









Reply










×
Showing balanced reviews improves the credibility of your positive reviews, so consider keeping them.Are you sure you want to delete this comment?
Yes
No








×
Your request has been sent.
Close









        Court & Arrest Records
        
            
            
                
            
        
    


Arrest and Criminal Records




    Mark may have Arrest and Criminal Records - Check Full Background Report to see possible arrest or conviction records we have found on Mark. This may include any DUIs, traffic tickets and outstanding warrants. When applicable, we may show where the crime occurred and provide details about the offense.


                View Full Background Details
            





Sex Offender Status




    Mark may have Sexual Offenses - Check Full Background Report to see a complete list of any and all sex offenses Mark may have been convicted of and his current sex offender status if applicable.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Lawsuits, Liens & Bankruptcies




    Mark may have Lawsuits, Liens & Bankruptcies - Check Full Background Report to see local, state and federal court documents, sensitive legal information and any litigation that Mark may have been involved in.  We'll reveal arrest details like case numbers, offense descriptions, and booking dates, where available.
                

                View Full Background Details
            







Family & Friends


Relatives/Associates




    Mark may have a record of Relatives/Associates - Check Full Background Report to see possible family members, friends, co-workers, and associates found from multiple government records, social and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Classmates




    Mark may have a record of associated Classmates - Check Full Background Report to see possible who they are and full classlists  found from school records and public sources.
                

                View Full Background Details
            





Neighborhood Information | Information based on current address








Age








Education Level










Household Income








Estimated Home Values










Top Buying Habits








Top Interests & Hobbies



















A Full Background Report Includes



Find Background Profiles & Reputation Scores for Everyone in the U.S.



                            MyLife searches government, social & public sources to pull together all details in one place
                        




                            Contact details include addresses, email, phone numbers, photos & social profiles and more
                        




                            Background checks include arrest & court records, education & work history, personal reviews and more to asses anyone's reputation
                        



Only MyLife Helps You Improve Your Background Report & Reputation Score



                            Edit & correct your own Background Report to look your best to employers, clients, friends, dates & others searching for you on Google.
                        




                            Ask friends, family, employers & clients to review you to improve your public Reputation Score.
                        




                            Remove your information from sites you can't control to protect your privacy
                        



See What MyLife Customers Are Saying

                        "When considering new tenants, you should always
                        check and verify their background to feel secure
                        & protected. MyLife makes it easy"
                    


- Ron W.




 







Back to Top




















×
Send Message


Message sent
An error has occurred, please try again later...


How do you know this person?

Please select (used to notify recipient)
Unknown
College
High School
Junior High School
Grade School
Met on MyLife.com
Is My Friend
Related to Me
Mutual Friend
Work
Club or Organization
Religion Affiliation
Not Sure
Don't Know Them
Found You Through a Dating Service
Found Your Service



Subject



Message




 Add/Track Contact
							







SEND NOW

















×


					Your message has been sent.
				











×
Help Mark build his reputation & public image 
Thank you for rating Mark Yosowitz
Please provide additional details to give people more insight into Mark's reputation. 



Sorry! We were unable to submit your review


                                        Please select at least one quality
                                    




Does Mark have these qualities?
Deselect all







Personal
Professional
Dating





 Smart
 Loyal
 Honest
 Good listener
 Humble
 Generous
 Fun
 Easy going
 Optimistic
 Kind
I would NOT be friends with Mark
 I would be friends

Is there anything you want to say about  on a personal level?
  (Optional)




 Responsible
 Hardworking
 Intelligent
 Collaborative
 Creative
 Resourceful
 Motivated
 Flexible
 Ambitious
 Articulate
I would NOT work with Mark

Is there anything you want to say about  on a professional level?
  (Optional)




 Faithful
 Respectful
 Understanding
 Funny
 Romantic
 Sexy
 Smart
 Passionate
 Good looking
 Good listener
 I would NOT date Mark

Is there anything you want to say about  concerning dating?
  (Optional)




You are responsible for your submissions, which must be true, lawful and not violate any person's rights. You agree to our User Agreement.







How do you know Mark?*

Friends
                                          Friend
Professional
Dating
Family Member
Neighbor
School
Club or Organization
Religious
Myself
Not Sure
Don't Know Them
Other







    Post anonymously
?






















































POST REVIEW








×

                        
                                Two Ways to Improve your Score
                            




Correct and Edit your extended background details
Correct & Edit


Ask Family & Friends  for positive reviews
  Send an Email
Share on Facebook










×





























×





Search to Find Background Reports & Publicly Exposed Personal Details on Anyone including Yourself.
Are You Mark Yosowitz?


YES
See & control your exposed background info
See, Monitor & Enhance Your Background Report that People are Viewing.


NO
See public background info on  Mark 
See Background Report to Learn  the Truth about Mark .











×





Thank you. We received your vote.











×






GET AN ADDITIONAL PREMIUM REPORT ON Mark Yosowitz
Premium data contains highly sensitive  info such as:

Arrest Records
Wealth & Assets
Lawsuits & Liens
Licenses & Permits
Sexual Offenses
Corp. Affiliations




                            In order to access the sensitive info on a Premium Report today, an additional fee is required. Remember, you do not need to purchase a Premium Report to access the info that is available in Standard Reports.
                        
BUY PREMIUM REPORT FOR  
No, thank you




THANK YOU FOR YOUR PURCHASE
Your Premium Report is now Ready
CLICK HERE TO SEE REPORT




There is a problem authorizing your charge on this card. Please try your card again or try another card.























Credit Card No.






Expiry Date

MM
01
02
03
04
05
06
07
08
09
10
11
12


Year

                                                        2017

                                                        2018

                                                        2019

                                                        2020

                                                        2021

                                                        2022

                                                        2023

                                                        2024

                                                        2025

                                                        2026

                                                        2027

                                                        2028

                                                        2029

                                                        2030

                                                        2031

                                                        2032

                                                        2033




CVC 









BUY PREMIUM REPORT FOR  
















×
You now have access to view Mark Yosowitz's Premium Background Report.

The information in this report is gathered from Government, Social & Public Records gathered from across the web.

                                    Access Mark's Premium Background Report
                                    









×
MyLife Protects & Builds Your Reputation


MyLife gathers up-to-date Government, Social & Public Records so you know what's public everywhere online and help you build your reputation for employers, friends and others that search for you here and on Google.
We recommended you:

Edit & Correct Your Background Report
Complete Your Profile Providing Positive Details
Ask Friends for Positive Reviews
See Who's Checking Your Background
Remove Unwanted Records You Can't Control










×
Review posted! Register to get reply alerts



New to MyLife? Register today for FREE.

Already a member?  Log in







































Name




Email

We respect your privacy


Message


Register to send your email

Gender

                                I am
                                Male
Female



Birthday


MM
01
02
03
04
05
06
07
08
09
10
11
12




DD




YYYY


Must be 13 years or older to join


ZIP Code



Password



Confirm Password




FIND MY PAGE

By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement & Privacy Policy




See & Monitor All Background Info That's Public On AnyoneWe'll show you all background information, personal reviews and other details from government records and proprietary sources across the web, plus alert you to changes.
Edit and Add-To Your Background Info, Personal Reviews and Social PostsControl your public details to look good to employers, clients, friends and anyone who finds you online.
Send Messages To Get In Touch With AnyoneGet complete contact info on anyone. Send unlimited messages to make valuable professional and personal contacts.












×





Sign up for FREE. See detailed background info for Mark Yosowitz











































                                        Already a member? Log in

























VIEW FULL DETAILS




                                       By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement &  Privacy Policy




*Must be 13 years or older to join






Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.
Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.


Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.
Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.












ï¿½
Send a message to  Mark



Compose your message





































Your name




From



Message




SEND YOUR MESSAGE

By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement & Privacy Policy









×





Sign up for FREE. See detailed background info for Mark Yosowitz











































                                        Already a member? Log in

























VIEW FULL DETAILS




                                       By clicking on the button above, you agree to our User Agreement &  Privacy Policy




*Must be 13 years or older to join






Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.
Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.


Send Message to Anyone Get complete contact info on anyone, make valuable professional and personal contacts.
Monitor Your Personal Info & Background Report that's Public Make sure it's accurate.
Edit Your Background Info & Personal ReviewsViewed by employers, clients, friends, or anyone
See Who's Searching for You ® Employers, friends, lovers, stalkers and others are looking for you.
Remove Private Information that's Exposed Stop sites from selling your private details online.












Find Anyone:

Find Anyone:
A|
B|
C|
D|
E|
F|
G|
H|
I|
J|
K|
L|
M|
N|
O|
P|
Q|
R|
S|
T|
U|
V|
W|
X|
Y|
Z







COMPANY
About Us
Testimonials
Press
Careers
Contact Us
Blog
FAQs




SERVICES
Monitor Your Identity
Remove Your Public Profiles
Background Check
See Who's Searching for You
Connect with Friends & Find People
Manage Your Membership




DIRECTORIES
People Search




Visit us on:












                Copyright © Sat Jul 29 01:19:59 PDT 2017 MyLife.com®, Inc. |
User Agreement |
Privacy Policy
U.S. Patent No. 6,701,348 and 6,694,353








	            * The other websites referenced on this site are owned and operated by their respective companies, and the associated trademarks and logos are the property of those companies. Links are provided for reference only and MyLife.com® does not imply any connection or relationship between MyLife.com® and these companies.
	        



 







 


R-Mark Certification




 










Scan to view on yourmobile device
 



Go



Sign In
              |  Contact MHI






Menu















R-Mark Certification


				For over 50 years, the Rack Manufacturers Institute (RMI) has been evolving consensus 

				standards for industrial steel storage racks. In 2012 the industry developed its latest 

				and most comprehensive consensus document RMI/ANSI 

				MH16.1 - 2012. The document includes seismic design provisions and has been accepted 

			  as the default standard for the International Building Code and NFPA Building Codes. RMI has further developed the National Standard for welded wire rack decking which has been adopted as RMI MH26:2-2007. Both documents serve as baseline specifications for the R-Mark Certification Program.

				The following companies hold an active R-Mark License:
For Industrial Steel Storage Racks:


Advance Storage Products
Atlanta Pallet Rack
Elite Storage Solutions, Inc.
Engineered Products
Equipement Boni Inc.
Frazier Industrial
Hannibal Industries, Inc.
Konstant
Interlake Mecalux Inc.
Nanjing Kingmore Logistics Equipment Manufacturing Company, Ltd.
Rack USA
Nanjing Huade Storage Equipment Manufacturing Co., LTD
Ridg-U-Rak, Inc.
Space Rak, Div. EWCO
Speedrack Products Group, Ltd.
Steel King Industries, Inc.
Unarco Material Handling / Kingway Material Handling
United Material Handling, Inc.
Wireway Husky Corporation


For Welded Wire Rack Decking


ITC Manufacturing
J&L Wire Cloth LLC
Nashville Wire Products, Inc.
Wireway Husky Corporation
Worldwide Material Handling Products, LLC


Members of RMI have voluntarily chosen to be guided by the appropriate 

                RMI/ANSI standards. RMI members have further voluntarily agreed to a certification process administered 

                through a panel of independent Registered Professional Engineers. The R-Mark Certification represents one leg of a 3-legged stool - the others being 

                Consensus Standards and Conformity. Initiatives in all three areas are part of a focused strategic objective launched in the 

                early 1990's. The purpose of this overview is to speak specifically to the R-Mark "leg". Suffice it 

                to say that all three "legs" are critically dependent on one another.  R-Mark is a registered asset of the Rack Manufacturers Institute (RMI) and is offered 

                under license to members and non-members who are proven to meet certain requirements.





                  Guiding Principles 
                



In developing consensus on a process, a number 
                of guiding principles were followed.  Process must be:

Open and Fair
Technically Sound
Credible
Non-Intrusive
Flexible
Self-Policing
Cost Effective 







                  Basic Conditions
                



General operating characteristics of the Program include:

Licensee must be a manufacturer of Industrial Steel Storage Racks or Welded Wire Rack Decking (as defined in the by-laws of RMI); 
Licensee may manufacture their products anywhere in the world, provided that the products are used in USA; 
RMI membership is NOT required to receive an R-Mark License; 
R-Mark can only be applied to product that conforms to and within the scope of the RMI/ANSI Standards as approved by the general membership of RMI; 
Licensing procedures/guidelines/frequency are developed, determined and directed by membership of RMI;
R-Mark may only be applied by a cognizant USA Registered Professional Engineer employed by the Licensee. 







                  Approval Process
                




Information about the R-Mark Process
R-Mark Recommendations

Highlights of the Certification and Licensing process follow:

Applicants for an R-Mark License contact the Managing Director of RMI, who, a)oversees a due diligent evaluation of applicants qualifications as defined in the by-laws of RMI, and, b)provides applicant with procedural and technical requirements;
Program requirements call for each applicant to prepare two identical submittal packages containing load tables for one or more standard "families" of load beams and one or more standard "families" of upright frames as outlined in the R-Mark Program Technical Requirements.
Applicant provides the necessary submittals under Seal of his/her cognizant USA Registered Professional Engineer;
RMI randomly selects two external Reviewers from a group of six independent USA Registered Professional Engineers chosen and approved by the RMI membership as having recognized experience and expertise in the design/application of racking systems;
Each Reviewer is sent one of the identical submittal packages. The packages contain all necessary tables, evidence of tests, and calculations to allow the Reviewer(s) to assess understanding of and conformity to the appropriate norms, including RMI/ANSI Standards. Any questions or needs are resolved between the Reviewers and Applicant acting together as one;
When satisfied that all requirements have been met according to R-Mark Certification Program guidelines set by the membership; the reviewing engineers notify the RMI Managing Director under Seal;
On receipt of both notices, RMI issues a License to the Applicant including uniquely numbered Seals and Stamps for use by the licensee's USA Registered Professional Engineer as outlined in the License.
Having earned the R-Mark Certification, Licensee is entitled to display the R-Mark on any qualified product designed and Sealed in the manner of their qualified submittals without any further review. 

The process is voluntary and is open to all rack manufacturers. RMI encourages specifiers 
				and users of Industrial Steel Storage Rack to consider the value of R-Mark certification 
				when applying racking solutions.
Questions on the program can be directed to 

				Pat Davison, MHI Director of Standards.
























×
Sign In Form





Enter your MHI username and password to sign in.

Username





Password






Forgot Your Password?




Close

















	Andrew N. Yosowitz - Lawyer in Columbus, Ohio (OH) Franklin County - legaldirectories.com




































xqrstqvyuedrxfzec


































	   Find a Lawyer
	   By Location
	   Areas of Practice
	   Experts & Services
	  
	   Products
      
       Online Store
	   Bar Links
	   About Us
	   Contact Us
	  
	   Disclaimer
	   Privacy Policy	  
	   Advance Search







Home > Browse Lawyers > All Cities in Ohio > Columbus Ohio Lawyers




















Andrew N. Yosowitz



  
    Update this Profile  

Update Basic Profile
Add Web Link
Add Mediator Listing
Add Area of Practice
Add Bundle Area of Practice
Add Bundle Biographical









Andrew N. Yosowitz is a Lawyer with Isaac Wiles Burkholder & Teetor, LLC, a Law Firm in Columbus, Ohio.







Andrew N. Yosowitz
 



Two Miranova Place
Suite 700
Columbus, 
		OH
43215-5098
        
      
Franklin County 





Contact Andrew N. Yosowitz

(614) 221-2121 
Send E-mail












Law Firm AffiliationIsaac Wiles Burkholder & Teetor, LLCLawyer ProfileFirm ProfileBiographical ListingAndrew N. Yosowitz, admitted to bar, 2002, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of Michigan (B.A., 1999); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2002).
 E−Mail: Andrew N. YosowitzIsaac Wiles Burkholder & Teetor, LLC is a Law Firm in Columbus, OH Laws of PracticeBusiness • Creditors' Rights • Environmental Law • Estate
Planning • Trust & Probate • Family Law • Intellectual Property •
Labor & Employment • Litigation • Public Law • Real Estate • TaxAddressTwo Miranova PlaceSuite 700Columbus, Ohio 43215PhoneTelephone: (614) 221-2121Facsimile: 365-9516EmailEmail Isaac Wiles Burkholder & Teetor, LLCWebsitewww.isaacwiles.comISAAC WILES BURKHOLDER & TEETOR, LLCAttorneys At LawTelephone: (614) 221-2121Facsimile: (614) 365-9516E-Mail:Send E-mailWebsite: www.isaacwiles.comTwo Miranova Place, Suite 700COLUMBUS, OHIO 43215-5098(Cincinnati Office—By Appointment Only)Telephone: (513) 791-720210979 Reed Hartman Highway, Suite 239CINCINNATI, OHIO 45242-2882Business • Creditors' Rights • Environmental Law • EstatePlanning • Trust & Probate • Family Law • Intellectual Property •Labor & Employment • Litigation • Public Law • Real Estate • Tax    Brandon L. Abshier, admitted to bar, 2008, Ohio. Preparatory education, North Carolina State University (B.S. Business/Finance, 2004); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 2008).
 E−Mail: Brandon L. Abshier    Scyld D. Anderson, admitted to bar, 1995, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S.E.P., 1986); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 1995).
 E−Mail: Scyld D. Anderson    Donald L. Anspaugh, admitted to bar, 1980, Ohio. Preparatory education, Bowling Green State University (B.A., summa cum laude, 1977); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 1980).
 E−Mail: Donald L. Anspaugh    Joanne S. Beasy, admitted to bar, 1994, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of Wisconsin-Madison (B.B.A., with honors, 1991); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 1994).
 E−Mail: Joanne S. Beasy    William B. Benson, admitted to bar, 1990, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.A., 1987); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1990). (Resident, Cincinnati, Ohio Office).
 E−Mail: William B. Benson    Kerry T. Boyle, admitted to bar, 2000, Ohio. Preparatory education, Ohio University (B.S., cum laude, 1995); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 2000). (Resident, Cincinnati, Ohio Office).
 E−Mail: Kerry T. Boyle    Daniel E. Bringardner, admitted to bar, 1978, Ohio. Preparatory education, Ashland College (B.S., Business Administration, cum laude, 1975); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1978).
 E−Mail: Daniel E. Bringardner    Bruce H. Burkholder, admitted to bar, 1980, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University; Bowling Green State University (B.S., 1977); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1980).
 E−Mail: Bruce H. Burkholder    Julianna R. Clark, admitted to bar, 2014, Ohio. Preparatory education, State University of New York at Buffalo (B.A., cum laude, 2011); legal education, University of Akron School of Law (J.D., magna cum laude, 2014).  E−Mail: Julianna R. Clark    Michael L. Close, admitted to bar, 1975, Ohio; 1976, Florida. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., 1967); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1975).  E−Mail: Michael L. Close    Dale D. Cook, admitted to bar, 1982, Ohio. Preparatory education, Trinity College (B.A., 1979); legal education, Duke University School of Law (J.D., 1982).  E−Mail: Dale D. Cook    Jay B. Eggspuehler, admitted to bar, 1986, New York; 1988, District of Columbia; 1990, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S.B.A., 1982); legal education, Pettit College of Law, Ohio Northern University (J.D., 1985). (Resident, Cincinnati, Ohio Office).  E−Mail: Jay B. Eggspuehler    Johnna M. Evans, admitted to bar, 2015, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., Psychology/Minor in Sociology, 2009); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 2015).  E−Mail: Johnna M. Evans    Christopher J. Geer, admitted to bar, 1978, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., Education, 1970); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1978).  E−Mail: Christopher J. Geer    J. Miles Gibson, admitted to bar, 1978, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., 1975); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1978).  E−Mail: J. Miles Gibson    Aaron M. Glasgow, admitted to bar, 2002, Ohio. Preparatory education, College of Wooster (B.A., Philosophy, 1998); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., magna cum laude, 2002).
 E−Mail: Aaron M. Glasgow    Michael T. Gunner, admitted to bar, 1973, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of Toledo (B.A., 1970); legal education, University of Toledo (J.D., 1973); Capital University (LL.M., 1988).  E−Mail: Michael T. Gunner    Carolyn E. Gutowski, admitted to bar, 2009, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., magna cum laude, 2006); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., cum laude, 2009).  E−Mail: Carolyn E. Gutowski    Molly R. Gwin, admitted to bar, 2011, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.A., English Literature/Mass Communication, cum laude, 2006); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2011).  E−Mail: Molly R. Gwin    Thomas L. Hart, admitted to bar, 1994, Ohio. Preparatory education, Wittenberg University (B.A., 1985); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1993).  E−Mail: Thomas L. Hart    James M. Hughes, admitted to bar, 1994, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S.B.A., 1987); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1994).  E−Mail: James M. Hughes    Frederick M. Isaac, admitted to bar, 1966, Ohio. Preparatory education, Yale University (B.A., 1963); legal education, Vanderbilt University (LL.B., 1966).  E−Mail: Frederick M. Isaac    David G. Jennings, admitted to bar, 1988, Ohio. Preparatory education, Wittenberg University (B.A., Political Science, 1980); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., with honors, 1988).  E−Mail: David G. Jennings    Shawn K. Judge, admitted to bar, 1998, Ohio. Preparatory education, College of Wooster (B.A., with honors, 1993); Wright State University (M.A., 1995); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., with honors, 1998).    Paul-Michael La Fayette, admitted to bar, 1996, Ohio; 2009, Florida. Preparatory education, West Virginia Wesleyan College (B.A., 1992); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1996).  E−Mail: Paul-Michael La Fayette    Mark Landes, admitted to bar, 1982, Kentucky; 1982, Ohio. Preparatory education, Johns Hopkins University (B.A., 1978); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 1982).
 E−Mail: Mark Landes    John C. Lucas, admitted to bar, 1976, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.A., Accounting, 1973); legal education, Case Western Reserve University School of Law (J.D., 1976).
 E−Mail: John C. Lucas    Mark C. Melko, admitted to bar, 1998, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.S., 1994); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., magna cum laude, 1998).  E−Mail: Mark C. Melko    Maribeth Meluch, admitted to bar, 1991, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.A., Microbiology/Zoology, 1982); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., cum laude, 1991).
 E−Mail: Maribeth Meluch    Timothy E. Miller, admitted to bar, 1986, Ohio. Preparatory education, Purdue University (B.S., 1983); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1986).  E−Mail: Timothy E. Miller    Dennis R. Newman, admitted to bar, 1968, Ohio. Preparatory education, Ohio Wesleyan University (B.A., 1965); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., cum laude, 1968).
 E−Mail: Dennis R. Newman    Holly E. Oak, admitted to bar, 2013, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.S., International Business, 2010); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., magna cum laude, 2013).
 E−Mail: Holly E. Oak    Robert C. Perryman, admitted to bar, 2012, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., Business Administration/Marketing, 2007; M.B.A., 2011); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2011).  E−Mail: Robert C. Perryman    James C. Phillips, admitted to bar, 2013, Texas; 2015, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of North Texas (B.A., 2010); legal education, St. Mary's University School of Law (J.D., 2013).  E−Mail: James C. Phillips    Patrick M. Pickett, admitted to bar, 1989, Ohio; 1991, District of Columbia; 1993, Virginia. Preparatory education, Bowling Green State University (B.S., cum laude, 1986); legal education, Pettit College of Law, Ohio Northern University (J.D., with high distinction, 1989).  E−Mail: Patrick M. Pickett    Samuel M. Pipino, admitted to bar, 1993, Ohio. Preparatory education, Oberlin College (B.A., 1990); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 1993).  E−Mail: Samuel M. Pipino    Cynthia B. Roberts, admitted to bar, 1991, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., Business Administration/Computer Science, 1985); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1991).
 E−Mail: Cynthia B. Roberts    James M. Roper, admitted to bar, 1987, Ohio. Preparatory education, Mount Union College (B.S., 1981); legal education, Capital University School of Law (J.D., 1987).  E−Mail: James M. Roper    Neil C. Sander, admitted to bar, 2004, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., 2001); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 2004). (Resident, Cincinnati, Ohio Office).
 E−Mail: Neil C. Sander    Yaima Seigley, admitted to bar, 2015, Ohio. Preparatory education, Boston University (B.A., 2010); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2015).  E−Mail: Yaima Seigley    Danielle M. Skestos, admitted to bar, 1999, Ohio. Preparatory education, Miami University (B.A., 1996); legal education, Capital University (J.D., cum laude, 1999).  E−Mail: Danielle M. Skestos    Steve M. Soltis, admitted to bar, 1967, West Virginia; 1968, Ohio. Preparatory education, West Virginia University (B.S., 1962); legal education, West Virginia University College of Law (J.D., 1967).
 E−Mail: Steve M. Soltis    Jeffrey A. Stankunas, admitted to bar, 2000, Ohio. Preparatory education, Bowling Green State University (B.A., cum laude, 1997); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2000).
 E−Mail: Jeffrey A. Stankunas    J. Stephen Teetor, admitted to bar, 1977, Ohio; 1979, District of Columbi. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., 1974); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., 1977).  E−Mail: J. Stephen Teetor    Matthew S. Teetor, admitted to bar, 2010, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., 2007); legal education, University Pre-Law Program, Oxford, England; Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2010).  E−Mail: Matthew S. Teetor    Gregory M. Travalio, admitted to bar, 1975, Pennsylvania; 1984, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of Pittsburgh (B.A., 1969); legal education, University of Pittsburgh School of Law (J.D., 1975).
 E−Mail: Gregory M. Travalio    Mark H. Troutman, admitted to bar, 2003, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., summa cum laude, 2000); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2003).
 E−Mail: Mark H. Troutman    Mark R. Weaver, admitted to bar, 1989, Pennsylvania; 1992, District of Columbia; 1995, Ohio. Preparatory education, Kutztown State University (B.S., 1983; M.P.A., 1985); legal education, Widener University School of Law (J.D., 1989).  E−Mail: Mark R. Weaver    Lee W. "Ike" Westfall, admitted to bar, 1996, Ohio; 1997, West Virginia; 1998, Indiana. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.S., Business Administration, 1990); legal education, Capital University Law School (J.D., cum laude, 1996).  E−Mail: Lee W. "Ike" Westfall    James M. Wiles, admitted to bar, 1970, Ohio. Preparatory education, Xavier University (B.S., 1967); legal education, Pettit College of Law, Ohio Northern University (J.D., 1970).  E−Mail: James M. Wiles    Andrew N. Yosowitz, admitted to bar, 2002, Ohio. Preparatory education, University of Michigan (B.A., 1999); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., 2002).
 E−Mail: Andrew N. Yosowitz    Alicia E. Zambelli, admitted to bar, 2007, Ohio. Preparatory education, Cornell University (B.S., Hotel Administration, 2001); legal education, Moritz College of Law, The Ohio State University (J.D., cum laude, 2007).  E−Mail: Alicia E. Zambelli    Brian M. Zets, admitted to bar, 1996, Ohio. Preparatory education, The Ohio State University (B.A., 1993); legal education, The University of Toledo College of Law (J.D., 1996).  E−Mail: Brian M. Zets





            Update Your Basic Profile on LegalDirectories.com
            by filling out those fields that need to be changed or add new information, then submit this form or 
            call 1-800-447-5375 and ask to update your Basic Profile on the Legal Search 
            Engine www.LegalDirectories.com website.





                    Basic Profile Form






For a more extensive profile 
                









the legal search engine







	 
	           Find a Lawyer | By Location | Experts & Services | Areas of Practice | Marketing Solutions | Home | Disclaimer











                      If you're a lawyer or an advertiser and want more information on how to 
                      grow your client base, please call a Sales Specialist at:
1-800-447-5375 ext. 116
Monday - Thursday7:00am to 5:30pm CST


















Legal Directories Publishing Company, Inc - The Legal Search Engine. All rights reserved








Use of this LegalDirectories.com web site and the information contained herein is subject to the restrictions and limitations described in Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.
By accessing or retrieving information from LegalDirectories.com, the user acknowledges and agrees to be bound by such Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.


Legal Directories Publishing Company, Inc. - 1313 Oates Drive, Mesquite, TX, 75150 - (800) 447-5375 (214) 321-3238



















mark yosowitz - AngelList
































































Join
 
Log In







AngelList


Startup Jobs

Recruit

Invest

More





Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help











Your Alumni Network








Companies

Freelancers

Incubators

Track

Salaries
Valuations

Help






































mark yosowitz






Mark is a passionate and strategically focused executive with a proven ability to launch, operate, advise, and oversee early -staged, high growth companies.







Operations



New York City



University of Pennsyl...










1 Connection



















There was a problem loading your content.


















mark yosowitz



Log in
or
sign up
to find connections to mark.





Connect














Experience











Mentored.com


President

2014 - Present (almost 3 years)



Executive for live on-demand 1:1 educational platform serving over 100,000 students (both DTC and and in schools) across the US. Mentored connects students with live experts... more over a mobile platform for academic assistance in math, science, test prep and more. Mentored also provides a SaaS platform for businesses that want to launch 1:1 learning for their customers. 












ThinkEco


Board Member, Adviser, Counsel

2008 - Present (almost 9 years)



NYC-based ThinkEco Inc. is a leading green IOT technology company providing cloud-based energy efficiency (EE) and demand response (DR) solutions for residential and commercial... more applications (B2B and B2C). ThinkEco markets a suite of energy-saving products to help make EE and DR intuitive for end users deployed to thousands of residents in the multi-award winning "CoolNYC"? program and in other US cities. 












Educational Direct


President, Co-Founder

2003 - 2008 (about 5 years)



Co-Owner/President of 300+ person company that grew from a pure start-up into the 3rd largest federal student loan consolidation company in the US with over $5.5 billion in... more loan volume, and annual revenues exceeding $150M that was sourced primarily through digital marketing strategies. The company was sold to a leading US private equity firm at $325M valuation in 2006.








Founder

 



Employee

ThinkEco, 
Educational Direct, 
Mentored.com



Investor

 



Syndicator

 



Incubator

 



Advisor

 



Attorney

 



Board Member

 



Mentor

 



Member

 



Acquired

 



Customer

 



Service Provider

 












Education















About










Achievements






Over the past 15 years, he has started, operated and exited several companies. He has broad expertise in strategy, technology, legal, operations, business development, commercial negotiations and strategy. Mark advises companies who want to take their businesses "to the next level" by supporting management teams with strategic initiatives. He won’t just tell you what you need to do, but will also guide and work directly with you to get it done.  Mark is a trusted advisor & mentor to many businesses in the US and UK.


Describe the most impressive thing you've done.























People also viewed












Joe Fernandez


Cofounder and CEO of Joymode....











Nick Green


Co-founder and Co-CEO @thrive-market 












Matt Krisiloff


Director at @ycombinator Research











Betsy Freeman


Designer | Raised Real












Florian van Rappard











Andrey Lavrov


CEO and Founder of @ococamera.












Bryan Russett


Co-founder & COO @datalogue 











Carylyne Chan


COO @keyreply. Multi-industry and...





























Help
·
Directory
·
Blog
Twitter
·
Terms & Risks
·
Unsubscribe

·
Mobile



·
Desktop


·

Profile not verified










Matches found M  Yosowitz in          the United States
    | Intelius






















Sign In




People Search
Background Check
Criminal Records
Reverse Lookup
Employee Screening
Identity Protection
Intelius Premier




Reverse Lookup
People Search








We've found M  Yosowitz


We've found 11 records on M  Yosowitz across 5 states in the United States.
            These states include
                                             New York,
                                                            Texas,
                                                            Arizona,
                                                            Illinois,
                                                            and California.
                                       
Access phone number, address records, educational information, professional data, background checks and more on M  Yosowitz with Intelius.

11 Records Found for M  Yosowitz
                           Nationwide
                     




Name
Age
Lived At
Related to




1.
Mark R Yosowitz
49
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       New York, NY                                                     Englewood Cliffs, NJ                                                     Sag Harbor, NY                                                     Brooklyn, NY                                               
 Nina Yosowitz 


2.
Michael Lawrence Yosowitz
45
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Houston, TX                                                     Geyserville, CA                                                     Healdsburg, CA                                                     Waianae, HI                                               
 Domenica Catelli Pammichael Yosowitz Jennifer Yosowitz Margaret Yosowitz 


3.
Marilyn Freyer Yosowitz
89
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Scottsdale, AZ                                                     Phoenix, AZ                                               
 Morris Yosowitz 


4.
Morris Abraham Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Scottsdale, AZ                                                     Phoenix, AZ                                               
 Marilyn Yosowitz 


5.
Mandell  Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Lawrenceville, IL                                               
 B Yosowitz Norma Yosowitz S Yosowitz 


6.
Margaret Joyce Yosowitz
74
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Houston, TX                                               
 Martin Kay Jennifer Yosowitz Michael Yosowitz Laura Yosowitz 


7.
Melinda  Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Bridgeport, IL                                                     Sumner, IL                                                     Robinson, IL                                               
 Jason Young Marcella Young 


8.
Mrse  Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Houston, TX                                                     Laguna Hills, CA                                               
 Esther Yosowitz Joseph Yosowitz 


9.
Mark R Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Los Angeles, CA                                               



10.
M  Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Lawrenceville, IL                                               
 Harod Yosowitz 


11.
M  Yosowitz

                                                                                                                                                                                                                       Olney, IL                                               








11 Results for M  Yosowitz have been Located in the Following States



New York
1
in 1 City


Texas
1
in 1 City


Arizona
1
in 1 City


Illinois
3
in 3 Cities


California
1
in 1 City







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














Mark R Yosowitz - New York, NY | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Mark R Yosowitz in New York, NY


Mark R Yosowitz

                                                                           Intelius found that Mark R Yosowitz  is  a male between 40 and 50 years old from New York, NY.  We have connected them to
                14 addresses,
                8 phones,
                and 1 relative or associate.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Mark R Yosowitz is in his 40s

Mark Has Lived In

New York, NY
Brooklyn, NY
Los Angeles, CA

Mark's Relatives

Nina Yosowitz







Mark R Yosowitz



Zodiac SignPisces



GenderMale



Professional Status
Professor at Brooklyn Law School



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Mark? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Mark, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Mark R Yosowitz
Get a Criminal Check on Mark R Yosowitz
Get a Public Record Report on Mark R Yosowitz
Get a People Search Report on Mark R Yosowitz


Mark R Yosowitz's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Mark R Yosowitz has lived as well as Mark R Yosowitz's phone numbers and email addresses.




Mark R Yosowitz Has Lived in 3 States
New York Address for Mark R Yosowitz


170 5** A** 

New York, NY


Has Lived In

New York, NY
Brooklyn, NY


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Mark R Yosowitz

() ***-**** - New York, NY 
(212) ***-**** - Englewood Cliffs, NJ 
(718) ***-**** - Brooklyn, NY 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Mark R Yosowitz

m**********z@***.com
m***********z@***.edu
m*****s@***.com


Get Email Report




Mark R Yosowitz's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Mark R Yosowitz's academic history.  Find out which schools Mark R Yosowitz attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Mark R Yosowitz received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Mark R Yosowitz Has Attended 4 Schools
Brooklyn Law School 1991 – 1994               Mark R Yosowitz has a Jd, Honors in Law               
Brooklyn Law School               1991 – 1994               Mark R Yosowitz has a Jd in law               
University of Pennsylvania               1986 – 1990               Mark R Yosowitz has a Ba, Honors in English               
University of Pennsylvania               1986 – 1990               Mark R Yosowitz has a BA in English               


Mark R Yosowitz's Professional Information
Information regarding Mark R Yosowitz's professional history.  Find out previous places Mark R Yosowitz has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Mark R Yosowitz Has Worked at 14 Places
Company: Brooklyn Law School
               Title: Professor
Company: Thinkeco Inc
               Title: Vice President, General Counsel
Mark R Yosowitz's Experience
Title: Professor
               Company: Brooklyn Law School
Job Details
               Company Size: $50 mil to less than $100 mil - Employee Range: 100 to less than 500
Title: Vice President, General Counsel
               Company: Thinkeco Inc
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 mil to less than $5 mil - Employee Range: Less than 25
Additional Professional Information on Mark R Yosowitz

 See Mark R Yosowitz's LinkedIn Profile



Mark R Yosowitz's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Mark R Yosowitz


Mark R Yosowitz's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Mark R Yosowitz's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Mark Yosowitz
Username Matches

                  MarkYosowitz
                  YosowitzMark
                  Mark.Yosowitz
                  Yosowitz.Mark
                  Mark_Yosowitz
                  Yosowitz_Mark
                  Mark-Yosowitz
                  Yosowitz-Mark
                  MYosowitz
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
M Yosowitz







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.











Yosowitz Edward E Md in Houston, Texas with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeHouston, TXYosowitz Edward E MdHouston, TX Yosowitz Edward E MdAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection1. Yosowitz, Edward E, MD6651 Main St Ste F1500Houston, TX 77030(713) 797-1144Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection2. Dr. Edward E Lynch, MD6550 Fannin St Ste 1601Houston, TX 77030(713) 441-4489Physicians & Surgeons, OncologyWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection3. Dr. Edward E Gaer, MD12121 Richmond AveHouston, TX 77082(281) 558-4477Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection4. Shubert Edward E17115 Red Oak Dr Ste 121Houston, TX 77090(281) 440-1500Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection5. Edward E Icaza, MD PA620 South Peek Rd.Katy, TX 77450(832) 437-8375Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection6. E Icaza Edward MD PAMOVED(15)23920 Katy Fwy Ste 405Katy, TX 77494(832) 437-8375Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteThe office staff here is so sweet and the dr is very confident and knowledgable. I actually look forward to my neuro appointments. However, Dr. Icaza has done such a wonderful job treating my pain that I don't think I'll be needing to see him much longer as it's nearly gone.Businesses in related categories to Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED7. Cypress Lakewood ClinicBBB Rating: A+11830 Fm 1960 Rd WHouston, TX 77065(281) 720-7467Physicians & SurgeonsMedical ClinicsWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Cypress Lakewood Clinic has been providing a range of medical and health care services for more than 20 years. The clinic practices in the fields of radiology and geriatrics. It offers preventive maintenance and medical management solutions. In addition, Cypress Lakewood Clinic provides exercise stress testing services. Th…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED8. SignatureCare Emergency Center - Montrose(2)1007 Westheimer RdHouston, TX 77006(281) 479-3293HospitalsEmergency Care FacilitiesWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoSignatureCare was absolutely amazing, and the best experience I’ve ever received. There was no wait time, friendly staff, and the doctor was nice and very helpful. I definitely recommend coming here.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection9. SignatureCare Emergency Center - Mission BendBBB Rating: A+8910 Highway 6 SHouston, TX 77083(281) 258-4351Emergency Care FacilitiesUrgent CareWebsiteDirectionsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection10. Bellaire Facial Surgery Center(1)6800 S Loop W Ste #350Houston, TX 77054(713) 665-9200Physicians & Surgeons, Oral SurgeryWebsiteDirectionsServicesMore InfoVery poor people skills, condescending and full of himself. Office staff was space cadet - Nurse was very responsive and kind. Would not recommend.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection11. Hoagan: Chiropractic(1)16525 Lexington BlvdSugar Land, TX 77479(281) 240-2225Chiropractors & Chiropractic ServicesDirectionsServicesMore InfoI never thought that my body can be “fine tuned” to help me play better golf. Hogan Chiropractic at Sugarland, Texas helped me with that. They have a golf performance program and teach you some golf exercises that you have to stick to. There are some therapy sessions involved too. I was first am…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection12. Memorial Hermann Nurse Health Line929 Gessner Rd Ste 2225Houston, TX 77024(877) 493-4118Urgent CareEmergency Care FacilitiesWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Feeling sick and not sure what to do? Call the free Nurse Health Line Now! When you or a family member is feeling sick, but you are not sure if you need to see your doctor or go to the hospital, call the free Nurse Health Line. Experienced nurses will help you decide when and where to go for medical care in Texas. These tr…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection13. Durrett Chiropractic736 Cypress Creek PkwyHouston, TX 77090(888) 344-0167Physicians & Surgeons, AcupunctureWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Offering chiropractics and acupuncture services. Providing Superior Health and Balance Through Chiropractic and Wellness Care! We are a chiropractic clinic which utilizes a team of health care professionals to provide sound solutions for today's health problems. Our highly trained staff truly cares about your health and we…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection14. Rogers, Mark R12000 Richmond Ave Ste 370Houston, TX 77082(281) 497-9993Physicians & SurgeonsSurgery CentersWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection15. Barlas Zeba4407 W Fuqua StHouston, TX 77045(713) 433-2500Physicians & SurgeonsMedical CentersDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection16. Spector, Ivan C3100 Weslayan StHouston, TX 77027(713) 963-0769Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED17. Wiener, Isidoro902 Frostwood DrHouston, TX 77024(713) 984-9143Physicians & Surgeons, Surgery-GeneralDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection18. Lawndale Medical Clinic(1)7109 Lawndale StHouston, TX 77023(713) 924-4194Medical ClinicsPhysicians & SurgeonsWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoTHE DOCTOR THERE IS  VERY  VERY  GOOD ( DR. RAMIREZ) BUT SOME OF THE STAFF IS VERY RUDE AND MEAN. TO SEE THE DOCTOR YOU HAVE TO SIGN IN AT 12:00 PM AND NO SOONER AND WHEN ITS TIME THE SECURITY GAURD IS VERY RUDE AND DOES NOT LET ANYONE GET IN THE ORDER THEY ARRIVED. HE SAY, " IT DOES NOT MATTER …Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection19. Whitmire, G A7515 Main StHouston, TX 77030(713) 796-2595Physicians & SurgeonsDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED20. McGOVERN ALLERGY and ASTHMA CLINIC, P.A.4710 Bellaire BlvdHouston, TX 77081(281) 860-2706Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteServices OfferedYP AdDirectionsMore InfoVisit our websitemcgovernallergy.comFrom Business: If you're suffering from asthma or allergies, seek assistance from the experts at McGovern Allergy and Asthma Clinic P.A. Allergy and asthma sufferers have turned to McGovern Allergy and Asthma Clinic P.A. for more than fifty years. From allergy testing and asthma care to allergy treatment, immunotherapy and other immunolo…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED21. 1960 Eye Surgeons13333 Dotson RdHouston, TX 77070(281) 214-5200Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteYP AdDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection22. Young Mitchell A MD1118 Barkdull StHouston, TX 77006(713) 522-1447Physicians & SurgeonsDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection23. Stephen A Tew3400 Bissonnet StHouston, TX 77005(713) 661-0404Physicians & SurgeonsDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection24. Red Oak Psychiatry Associates PA17115 Red Oak DrHouston, TX 77090(281) 893-0064PsychologistsWebsiteDirectionsFrom Business: Please Contact Us for More InformationAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection25. Nelson, Bruce R7737 Southwest FwyHouston, TX 77074(713) 981-6222Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection26. M,eixner Susan T5615 Kirby DrHouston, TX 77005(713) 529-3119Physicians & SurgeonsDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection27. Hamilton Steven6624 Fannin StHouston, TX 77030(713) 797-1007Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection28. Jarrett, Alan902 Frostwood Dr Ste 146Houston, TX 77024(713) 461-1169Physicians & Surgeons, OphthalmologyWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED29. The Forum At Memorial Woods(2)777 N Post Oak RdHouston, TX 77024(713) 481-2961Retirement Apartments & HotelsWebsiteCouponsSee Our ServicesDirectionsMore InfoCome See Our Brand New Model Apartments+1moreWhat a great place this is!!! Dad has been in the Assisted Living for a year now and my sister and I could not be happier. The facility is lovely and very clean. There are multiple activities for the resident to do, including trips to Galveston or Brenham, etc. they go to the movies, the museum …Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collectionPREFERRED30. Nikko Cosmetic Surgery Center(9)1001 West Loop SHouston, TX 77027(713) 960-1311Physicians & Surgeons, Pediatrics-Plastic...WebsiteCouponsDirectionsMore InfoSurgery Consultation CreditDr. Nikko is seriously the greatest plastic surgeon in Houston. My wife had wanted to get a breast augmentation for a few years and had gone through a few consultations with plastic surgeons in the area, but she never felt comfortable or trusted any of them enough to schedule the surgery. When m…Sponsored LinksRelated Articlesfor Yosowitz Edward E Mdmore related articles »Drug Abuse: Symptoms to Look for in a Loved One »One out of every seven Americans will face a substance addiction. Here are some resources to help you help a loved one, and notice…The January 2017 To-Do List »The holiday festivities are over, but January doesn't have to be a drag. It's actually the best time to finish projects and organize your life – all while having a little fun. Urgent Care: What to Know, When to Go »We needed an ear, nose and throat specialist, but the wait at our HMO was two weeks. What now? An emergency room seemed like overk…Map ViewSponsoredCypress Lakewood Clinic11830 Fm 1960 Rd W, Houston, TX 77065(281) 720-7467High Quality Medical CareWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoBarlas Zeba4407 W Fuqua St, Houston, TX 77045(713) 433-2500Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoCypress Lakewood Clinic11830 Fm 1960 Rd W, Houston, TX 77065(281) 720-7467WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoAurora Gonzalez MDPA & Associates(2)6410 Fannin St Ste 1200, Houston, TX 77030(713) 757-9905ALWAYS ACCEPTING NEW PATIENTSWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoMcGOVERN ALLERGY and ASTHMA CLINIC, P.A.4710 Bellaire Blvd, Houston, TX 77081(281) 860-2706Call for diagnosis/treatment of Asthma & AllergiesWebsiteServices OfferedYP AdDirectionsMore InfoDr. Esta L. Kronberg, MD(35)7500 Beechnut St Ste 228, Houston, TX 77074(832) 409-0032Board Certified DermatologistWebsiteDirectionsVideoMore InfoSchwartz Jan Miller MD902 Frostwood Dr Ste 153, Houston, TX 77024(713) 467-9671Call Today to Schedule An AppointmentWebsiteServices OfferedYP AdDirectionsMore Info1960 Eye Surgeons13333 Dotson Rd, Houston, TX 77070(281) 214-5200WebsiteYP AdDirectionsMore InfoYoung Mitchell A MD1118 Barkdull St, Houston, TX 77006(713) 522-1447Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoSpector, Ivan C3100 Weslayan St, Houston, TX 77027(713) 963-0769Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoPediatric Associates(2)4501 Groveway Dr, Houston, TX 77087(713) 644-1568Contact Us for InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoStephen A Tew3400 Bissonnet St, Houston, TX 77005(713) 661-0404Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoWhitmire, G A7515 Main St, Houston, TX 77030(713) 796-2595Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoBeckman Randall L DPM8945 Long Point Rd, Houston, TX 77055(713) 461-1010WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoRamos, Antonio, MD1302 N Shepherd Dr, Houston, TX 77008(713) 885-9899Primary Care PhysicianWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoNelson, Bruce R7737 Southwest Fwy, Houston, TX 77074(713) 981-6222Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoLaborde Dermatology(4)1333 S Loop W, Houston, TX 77054(713) 960-0700Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoBurgower & Rainwater LLP3355 W Alabama St, Houston, TX 77098(713) 529-3982Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoHamilton Steven6624 Fannin St, Houston, TX 77030(713) 797-1007Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoM,eixner Susan T5615 Kirby Dr, Houston, TX 77005(713) 529-3119Contact Us For InformationDirectionsMore InfoPamela M. Carr MDPA1111 Highway 6 Ste 160, Sugar Land, TX 77478(832) 460-2266WebsiteDirectionsVideoMore InfoLaser Spine InstituteServing the Houston area.(866) 382-7494WebsiteLocal ListingsVideoMore InfoTexas ENT SpecialistsServing the Houston area.(832) 678-8300WebsiteMore InfoDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glassHelpful Reviews Thomas P. McHugh, MDlovelykarjon ratedDr. McHugh is a wonderful doct...Dr. McHugh is a wonderful doctor and I am so happy with my results. I went around to several other doctors, and to be mature, I won't comment on the experiences there, but out of all, Dr. McHugh, his wife and staff were the most friendly and kind. I was greeted by the most friendly and helpful receptionist, when I was booking my appointment on the phone, I was so amazed at the knowledge she had regarding the procedures I wanted to schedule.  At the consultation, which was for liposuction and  reduction, Dr. McHugh did not rush through the consultation. He took his time to explain in full detail the procedures that I was interested in, and I had a list of questions, in which he answered them all. I was a little nervous, because of previous consultations elsewhere that did not put me at ease, but Dr. McHugh really put me at ease. He did mention that it would be a good idea, but I did not have to get   Lympatic Drainage massages as needed. At the conclusion of the consultation, I got to meet his beautiful wife, Katherine. I have heard negative things about her, but those negative things are so untrue. She is the most down to earth walking Barbie Doll! Great sense of humor! She presented me with the pricing information of the surgery and lymphatic massages. I decided at the consultation that Dr. McHugh was my surgeon for my surgeries, but was short on finances, so Katherine's sister, very friendly and personable, assisted me in getting financed with Care Credit.It was 5 minutes to closing, but she did not rush me out and also worked on getting me codes to make a claim on my insurance for my reduction. After my surgery, his nurse, Ashley, called me every day to check on my progress and was a great support when Dr. McHugh was unable to speak on the phone to address my healing concerns. I do not regret using Dr. McHugh, and I will be using him again in the near future for a necklift! Mattioli Vision Professionals, PAnancychautran ratedProfessional &amp; AwesomeDr. Mattioli did my sister's LASIK a few years ago and thankfully I was able to find him at his new practice.I've had a consult done at another LASIK location but they weren't as welcoming and thorough as Dr. Mattioli. He sat down and discussed every finding and actually explained it in basic terms from my first consult up until the day of my surgery.His team is outstanding. They specialize in what they do and of course are darn good at it. I rarely leave an office knowing everyone's names or what their personalities are like outside of work, but Laura, Jonah, and Janet make an extra effort to have conversations with you to take the ease out of having a boring eye exam. Can you say team LONGEVITY? They've been with him for over 8 years!Lastly, I have to briefly touch base on his technology for all you tech enthusiasts out there. The practice is fairly new so that also means new equipment and newest laser technology!  Your check-in paperwork is completed on an ipad. All of your test data from the eye exams are mapped out on a computer screen so the Dr. can go over and point out what's normal and abnormal within your exam. My LASIK procedure took less than 20 minutes and I was able to see the wall clock for the first time without glasses in 17 years! Thanks Dr. Mattioli - Laura - Janet - Jonah!Berkeley Eye Center - Katy FreewayNeil S. ratedThere are no words to express the level of excellence provided by Dr. Yankelove, Brenda and the entire staff during my Lasik procedure. From the very first day of my Lasik consultation with Brenda Castillo, to the day of my post-op appointment, every step met and exceeded all expectations that I had. Dr. Yankelove was beyond knowledgeable and talented in his field, and it felt very reassuring to get such an important procedure done with an expert of his sort. Brenda was extremely personable and approachable throughout the process and made me feel comfortable and at east throughout. Moreover, they are competitively priced and provide options to meet your financial needs/capabilities. They use the best technology and was a painless procedure, and I had fantastic results the very same night! I would recommend anyone and everyone to this facility if they are considering Lasik- you are in the best hands with a friendly and capable staff. Thanks to Dr. Yankelove and the entire team!El Centro De Corazon 4Leila A. ratedHolistically based healthcare for the whole family--couldn't be happier with the amazing physicians, entire staff and conveniently structured comprehensive services.It's so nice not to have to have to leave the neighborhood for any of our basic healthcare needs. My husband and I can visit our primary care doctor, bring the kids to their pediatrician and all see the same dentist--all under the same roof. Love all the specialized services and programs El Centro offers too. Finally, the "extras" like nutritional counseling for my stepson who has Type 1 Diabetes and behavioral health services for our little ADHD-bots are easily and conveniently accessible too.And the best part of all: Everything is not only available in one place, just down the street, but our private insurance is accepted too! No more searching for and traveling to providers on all sides of town... Thank you, El Centro--truly and from the bottom of my HEART!Mattioli Vision Professionals, PAjoycechiuri ratedDr. Mattioli's office and his staff are very courteous and friendly, they greeted me as soon as i walked into their office.  I went in for a lasik consultation, hoping to get lasik done after wearing glasses for almost 20 years. The doctor answered all my questions and concerns, i had a thorough full exam and the cost was credited into my lasix surgery fee, as soon as he told me i was a good candidate for lasik surgery, we set up an appointment and the nurses helped me figure out the financial stuff. the day of the procedure went very well, everything was thoroughly explained to me and the technology was very impressive. I would definitely recommend him to all my family and friends. I am very pleased with my surgery and i plan on keeping him on as my regular eye doctor.Dr. Shannon Hardy: Complete Women's Care CenterT R. ratedThe office was absolutely gorgeous and immediately makes you feel comfortable as if you were in your own home. The cleanliness and the friendly environment made my experience great before I even went into see Dr. hardy. She was very straightforward and kind when she was talking with me. It definitely put me at ease regarding my issue. I also like how they give you adequate time to get undressed and situated. At other offices, I did not have this same experience. The staff seems to truly care shown by touching on family risk factors and keep up to date with annual testing. After examination she made me feel so relieved. I scheduled my annual exams today and cannot wait to come back. This was a great experience.Li, Huaiguang, MDTim 1. ratedI am a patient. Dr. Li is considerate for me and wise at practicing medicine. As I google his name and read about his background, I find his professional experience further demonstrates significant intellectual capacity even among doctors.  He was schooled in PR China and did much research work there. He came to US as a research scholar but passed exams of US Medicine Board without obtaining a MD in US. But many US-educated MDs can't pass those exams. Meanwhile, he fulfilled the residency requirements which demand grasp of English and much understanding of people. Medicine is a science which require smart people to properly practice. Dr Li is a right person to do so.Hickman, Timothy N, MDL W. ratedWe were referred to Dr. Hickman from multiple friends and colleagues. We had a previous failed IVF experience with another doctor. After explaining our concerns with Dr. Hickman, he was very confident in his plan to get us pregnant. From day 1 we were treated amazingly. The staff greeted me by name, and I formed wonderful relationships with his team. I looked forward to visits because of how positive and uplifting his group was. I met with two other doctors on his team during my stimulation and everyone was wonderful. I highly recommend anyone seeking fertility assistance to start with Houston IVF. We are currently 8 weeks pregnant with a healthy growing baby!Berkeley Eye Center - Katy FreewayTom O. ratedCataract surgery and Lasik procedures were performed by Dr. Yankelove. The pre, during and post procedural care was absolutely excellent. All questions were answered and Dr. Yankelove and his staff treated me like I was their only patient. The results were excellent. The entire staff is caring and proffessional and I have referred several people to Dr. Yankelove. He has the best "bedside manner" I have ever experienced. I have recently been diagnosed as having diabetes. Guess who I went to see for my vision evaluation? Yup, Dr. Yankelove and staff. 2 years later they still continue to provide the best of care and still remembered me by name. The very best!Medinet Family Care Cliniclawyer2050 ratedMy experience with Medinet has always been without problems. The staff is excellent, and the clinic is doing a commendable job. The x-ray tech there is so nice and professional! Although some days the waiting time can be greater than 30 minutes, I always come here specifically to see Dr. Gandhi and it is worth it. There clinic is also convenient because they do everything under one roof. I get my labs, x-rays, and vaccines done there plus many other procedures. Dr. Gandhi is a very professional and good doctor. I highly recommend Medinet Family Care Clinic as I have come here for 10 years and still love the service and treatment they provide here. Did You Know?Physicians and surgeons help to keep people - from infants to the elderly - as healthy as possible. These individuals provide diagnoses and treatments for a wide variety of ailments, and preventative care and early detection for more serious illnesses. Whether you love or hate going to the doctor, the fact is your physician is there to listen to your health concerns, take preventative measures against diseases and advise you on your options for staying in tip-top shape.In 2013, there were more than 1 million doctors of medicine in the U.S., over 854,000 of which were active. Additionally, in 2012, there were about 18,000 active general surgeons in the country. It's important to know which type of physician or surgeon you need, how to choose the best one, and account for other considerations in order to stay healthy.Different Types of PhysiciansPatients can choose from a wide variety of physicians depending on doctor specialty and what problems they are experiencing. Here are a few of the most common types of physicians that you may see in your lifetime:General Practitioner
Your GP is the doctor that you go to for regular checkups, vaccines and to identify health issues. GPs can treat many different illnesses and injuries, from the common cold to a broken arm. If your health requires a second opinion or expert care, the GP will refer you to a specialist who has the skills to focus in on the issue.Cardiologist
Heart attacks and heart disease are some of the most common afflictions seen across the country, making cardiologists important to your long-term health. These physicians specialize in studying and treating the heart and related diseases.Dentist
Other than a GP, the dentist is likely the most common physician you'll ever see. These professionals work with the human mouth, ensuring that your teeth and gum health are up to par. Patients typically go to the dentist twice a year.Dermatologist
Dermatologists are focused on skin-related issues and diseases, from skin cancers, to acute acne, eczema, psoriasis, and general cosmetic concerns like aging and scars. Most will also perform annual or semi-annual mole checks to screen for any signs of melanoma, the most serious form of skin cancer.ENT
If you have a number of sinus infections or have had your tonsils taken out, you've likely seen an ENT specialist. ENTs handle ailments related to the ear, nose and throat, often related to taking out tonsils and treating hearing issues.OB/GYN
For many women, their gynecologist and obstetrician are the same person. These professionals work with the female reproductive system to focus on reproductive health, fertility issues, prenatal care, options for new and expectant mothers, neonatal care and childbirth. OB/GYNs can also help in the early detection of breast or cervical cancer.Choosing a PhysicianThere are obviously a number of physicians that you can choose from, but how do you know if they're the best choice for you? Here are a few considerations to help you pick a physician:Look at Your Insurance
Before you get down to the details, you need to verify which doctors are covered by your insurance and whether they are in or out of your carrier's network. Rates may be cheaper if the doc is in network – a doctor can be covered by your insurance but not necessarily in network. Out of network is typically more expensive. Doctors often add and drop plans, so it's important to ensure that your options are compatible with your insurance plan. Doing your homework will help you avoid unexpected expenses. Check for Board Certification
Your physician should be certified through the American Board of Medical Specialties. Doctors must earn a medical degree from a qualified school, complete three to seven years of residency training, be licensed by a state medical board and pass one or more ABMS exams to be certified.Examine the Reviews
Reviews of a doctor can reveal a lot about what your experience may be like. People may grade on staff friendliness, availability and effectiveness of treatment. Looking at these evaluations and getting recommendations from family and friends can direct you toward a physician for your needs.Choosing a SurgeonSurgeons can literally hold your life in their hands, and it's important to find the best one that can put you at ease and treat you effectivelyCompatibility Factor
You need to feel comfortable with your surgeon. It's important to communicate your concerns and that your surgeon can respond adequately. Surgeons should be willing to go over the details of your procedure and answer any questions that you may have. They must take the time to discuss and address your worries.Expertise Level
If you're going in for surgery, you want someone that knows what they're doing and has a high success rate. Ask how often the surgeon performs this surgery and try to find one that regularly does it. This will give you peace of mind that you're in capable hands.Understanding Your InsuranceYour decision on a physician or surgeon can be majorly affected by the insurance plan you have. You may have insurance through employment, your spouse, your parents if you're under 26, or the marketplace if the previous options don't apply to you. It's important to understand how your insurance works to have the full picture of what you'll need to pay for.Your insurance will have a deductible, which is the amount that you're responsible to pay for covered medical expenses. Some plans have coinsurances, where you must pay a certain percentage of the bill, and insurance will cover the rest. Co-pays state a flat rate for certain services, like paying $20 when you visit your GP or a $100 co-pay for an emergency room visit. Once you reach your out-of-pocket maximum, which will differ if you're an individual or within a family plan, your insurance may pay for 100 percent of covered medical expenses for the rest of the plan year.If you plan to go to the doctor, need medication or have been recommended for surgery, call your insurance provider or go online to see what your plan covers. You can choose the best doctor for your needs, understand your options and prevent yourself from being blindsided by medical expenses.Setting Your AppointmentMost doctors require a phone call for an appointment, although some may provide online scheduling as well. Be sure to have your insurance card with you when you set an appointment, and to bring it with you to the actual appointment. They need the ID numbers to verify your coverage, and will usually make a copy of the card for their files so you don't have to show it again unless your insurance changes.When you call, let them know if you're a new patient, as this will require you to complete some paperwork for your first visit. Tell them the reason for your visit, such as your symptoms if you're feeling sick. It's also important to inform them if you have Medicaid and to find out if you need to bring anything to the visit, like current medications or medical records.From here, the receptionist will likely ask what dates and times work best for you. During your call, it's important to be honest about your symptoms and the reason for your visit. This information will help the doctor treat you and give him or her an idea of what to expect. Your appointment may progress faster as a result, and the doctor can come prepared with a list of options to better care for you.RisksDoctors see a number of patients in a day, sometimes in 15-minute increments in areas where the physicians are in high demand. This can leave little time for doctors to perform thorough examinations, and they can end up missing certain problem indicators. While some problems, like a cold or flu, can be diagnosed in this time, more complex ailments require attention, which takes up time. Reviews can illuminate which doctors actively spend the necessary time with their patients and which ones are pressed against the clock to meet demand.Surgery has some more dire risks attached to it, so be sure to talk to your surgeon about the potential issues that can come up as a result of your procedure. If a patient has a reaction to anesthesia, it can cause very serious complications, but this is an uncommon occurrence. Blood clots can be a significant problem after surgery, often caused by inactivity during recovery. Infections, numbness, scarring, swelling and death are all possible, but the likelihood of these issues will vary depending on the type of surgery you're undergoing. Talk to your doctor about your concerns and your risk potential.AftercareSurgery affects people in different ways, but as you begin to emerge from anesthesia, you'll want to alert your nurse to any issues you may have. The nurse will tell you how the procedure went, what effect it will have on your condition, what to expect when you get home and how long it will take to get back to normal. If you start feeling pain, the nurse may give you medication to stop it from getting worse. When possible, it's also advised to move around to avoid blood clots from developing in your legs. This can be as simple as occasionally flexing your knee or rotating your foot. Some surgeries are outpatient procedures, where people are released the same day. For major surgeries, patients may stay at the hospital for a few days to be monitored and address any concerns before being sent home. Discuss with your surgeon the projected length of the hospital stay and what you need to bring.Recovery and Follow-upYour recovery time and follow-up expectations will vary depending on your procedure. For example, you can be expected to be on your feet within a few days of having your wisdom teeth taken out, but it may be weeks before you have fully recovered from a broken foot or heart-valve surgery. Your surgeon will give you a list of things that you'll need to do during this time, including what medications to take and when you'll be able to get back to work and other activities.Every surgery will have a follow-up call or appointment to discuss your recovery and allow you to ask any questions about unusual symptoms or changes in your overall health. If you have a major operation, like heart surgery, it's important to make regular checkups with your doctor or a specialist to ensure that everything is normal. Visiting a doctor will help deter infection and verify that everything is healing as expected. These appointments will give you peace of mind about your state of health and ensure that any issues are caught early on. 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback
